Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. In General.
§ 65-1-47.
Control of highways; eminent domain.

The State Highway Commission shall have complete authority to issue rules, regulations and orders under which the State Highway Department shall have control and supervision, with full power and authority under rules, regulations and orders issued by the commission, to locate, relocate, widen, alter, change, straighten, construct or reconstruct any and all roads on the state highway system heretofore or hereafter taken over by it for maintenance as a part of such system, and shall have full and complete authority for regulating the making of all contracts, surveys, plans, specifications and estimates for the location, laying out, widening, straightening, altering, changing, constructing, reconstructing and maintaining of and the securing of rights-of-way for any and all such highways, and to authorize the employees of the State Highway Department to enter upon private property for such purposes.

The State Highway Department, under the rules, regulations and orders spread upon the minutes of the State Highway Commission, is authorized and empowered to obtain and pay for the rights-of-way of such width as it may determine to be necessary for such highway or for any alteration or change therein or relocation thereof by agreement with the owners of such lands. Rights-of-way of not less than sixty (60) feet wide shall be acquired except within the boundaries of towns and cities where unusual conditions exist, in which case the commission is authorized and empowered to have obtained and paid for such rights-of-way of such width as it may determine to be necessary. Said commission may have condemned any and all land or other property needed for such purposes or either of them; may have condemned or acquired by gift or purchase lands containing road building materials and develop and operate pits, mines or other properties for the purpose of obtaining road material; and have condemned or acquired by gift or purchase lands necessary for the safety and convenience of traffic.

Said commission, in case an agreement cannot be reached with the owners of land containing road building materials or of any additional land necessary for widening any existing public highways, for laying out a new public highway, or for changing the route of an existing public highway, as provided in the foregoing part of this section, shall be authorized to have condemned any land needed for either of said purposes, as is fully set forth in this section. The proceedings to acquire such lands by a condemnation shall be in conformity with the statutes on the subject of “eminent domain,” the power of eminent domain being hereby expressly conferred upon said commission for such purposes. Such proceedings shall take precedence over all other causes not involving the public interest in all courts and shall be given preference to the end that construction and reconstruction of highways hereunder may not be unreasonably delayed. The amount of such compensation and damages, if any, awarded to the owner in such proceedings shall be paid out of the State Highway Fund. The authorities constructing such highway, under the authority as provided in this section, shall use diligence to protect growing crops and pastures and to prevent damage to any property not taken. So far as possible, all rights-of-way shall be acquired or contracted for before any construction contract work order is issued.

The estate which the State Highway Commission is authorized to acquire by deed or condemnation as set forth above shall include all rights, title and interest in and to the lands or property being acquired, excepting and excluding all the oil and gas therein or thereunder and such other rights, title or interest which are expressly excepted and reserved to the property owner, his successors, heirs or assigns in the deed or condemnation petition by which the property is acquired. Any property interest acquired may be in unlimited vertical dimension. The State Highway Commission shall decide what right, title and interest are necessary for highway purposes on each particular project and may, by order on its minutes, authorize its agents to expressly except all or any others.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4998; 1942, § 8023; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 8; Laws, 1949, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, § 12; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 6; Laws, 1987, ch. 406, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 65-1-49.
Easements for highway purposes.

The conveyance or assignment of easements for highway purposes may be made by the owner thereof to the Mississippi State Highway Commission or the board of supervisors of any county for highway purposes. All actions by any person owning any interest in the land involved in such conveyance or assignment accruing as a result thereof must be brought within three years after the date of such conveyance or assignment; provided, however, that the land involved is actually used for highway purposes or notice is posted thereon that it will be used for highway purposes within said three-year period, otherwise said period shall be six years from the date of such conveyance or assignment.

The procedure provided hereby with reference to the conveyance or assignment of easements is supplemental to all rights and powers now authorized for and existing under the present law in said commission and boards, and is not intended as a limitation on same in any manner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.1; Laws, 1950, ch. 410, §§ 1, 2.

§ 65-1-51.
Land adjacent to highway rights of way; wetlands.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise, and may have the Mississippi Department of Transportation improve and maintain strips of land necessary for the restoration, preservation and enhancement of scenic beauty adjacent to the state highway rights-of-way. The commission may acquire and have the Transportation Department develop publicly owned and controlled rest and recreation areas and sanitary and other facilities within or adjacent to the highway right-of-way reasonably necessary to accommodate the traveling public.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission, in its discretion, may acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise, including the exercise of eminent domain, public or privately owned wetlands and other lands suitable for creation as wetlands for the purpose of mitigating wetland losses and replacing those wetlands purchased and damaged or eliminated by development and use, on a basis not to exceed that required by the Federal Highway Administration as a condition for receiving federal aid funds, provided that some governmental agency or approved organization agrees, without compensation, to accept title to the lands acquired and maintain such lands as wetlands in perpetuity. However, the commission shall replace those coastal wetlands purchased and damaged or eliminated by development and use on the basis required by the “Coastal Wetlands Protection Law” and regulations promulgated thereunder by the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission, in its discretion, may acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise, wetlands credits from an approved organization with a plan establishing a wetland mitigation bank. The commission shall, if possible, acquire credits on wetlands within the State of Mississippi before acquiring credits on wetlands located outside the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8023.3; Laws, 1966, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 7; Laws, 1989, ch. 382, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 130; Laws, 2000, ch. 575, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 65-1-53.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 397, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

[Codes, 1942, § 8023.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 336, §§ 1, 2]

§ 65-1-55.
Noxious weeds and plants prohibited in rights of way.

No seed can be bought or planted by the Mississippi Highway Department for right of way seeding that contain more than the maximum allowance for noxious weed seed as prescribed by the Mississippi Pure Seed Law and regulations. No sodding will be allowed that contains prohibited noxious weed plants or tubers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038-21; Laws, 1964, ch. 460, § 1, eff from and after June 5, 1964.

§ 65-1-57.
Secondary highways.

It shall be the duty of the Highway Commission to issue rules and regulations for the State Highway Department to construct all secondary roads, when taken over for construction and maintenance, up to such standard of specifications and with such surfacing material as the Highway Commission may determine from a traffic census of the use and importance thereof as would be justified from a standpoint of economy and convenience to the traveling public. To this end the Highway Commission is authorized, in dealing with said secondary roads, to have the highway department place surfacing material on said secondary roads. All secondary roads shall be constructed and maintained with a view of being eventually hard surfaced as provided for primary roads.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5000; 1942, § 8032; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 10 (second paragraph); Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-59.
Status of existing state highways; annual report of recommendations.

It shall be the duty of the Mississippi Transportation Commission to have the Mississippi Transportation Department carry out all contracts and agreements, including federal-aid projects and agreements under the County Highway Aid Law of 1946, being Sections 65-11-1 through 65-11-37, heretofore made or entered into with any county, subject, however, to applicable rules and regulations of the Federal Highway Administration. It shall be the duty of the Transportation Commission to continue to have the Mississippi Transportation Department maintain all state highways now under maintenance or hereafter taken over for maintenance, the purpose of this provision being to preserve the status quo of all state highways insofar as such highways have been taken over and control and jurisdiction has been assumed by the Mississippi Transportation Commission and Mississippi Transportation Department; however, except as otherwise provided in this section, if any highway or link of highway is removed from the state highway system by legislative act or by relocation or reconstruction, it shall no longer be maintained by or be under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission or Mississippi Transportation Department, but shall be returned to the jurisdiction of the board of supervisors of the county or governing authorities of the municipality through which such road runs. Except as to segments of highways shorter than three (3) miles which have been or which are hereafter replaced through curve straightening or minor realignment, the Transportation Commission shall retain and have the Mississippi Transportation Department maintain as state highways all portions of U.S. highways that either before or after July 1, 1989, have been or are replaced and constructed as a part of the interstate highway system, or four-lane primary system, or which are replaced and constructed or are designated to be replaced and constructed as part of the highway system under Section 65-3-97, including portions of all such highways so replaced, or which under Section 65-3-97 are designated to be replaced, by municipal bypasses; and such highways and portions thereof shall be continued to be maintained as a part of the Mississippi state highway system until removed from such system by legislative act. All such highways and portions thereof which, by virtue of the provisions of this section, are returned on or after July 1, 1989, to the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall be maintained by the Mississippi Transportation Department only to the traffic capacities existing at the time that they are returned and any subsequent traffic capacity improvements or other improvements desired by the county or municipality within which such highway or portion thereof is located shall be performed in accordance with highway standards approved by the Transportation Commission and the expenses for making such improvements shall be paid by the county or municipality; however, all highways and portions thereof so improved by the county or municipality shall thereafter be maintained by the Mississippi Transportation Department. Before any highway or portion thereof is returned to the Transportation Commission under this section, the county or municipality having jurisdiction thereof shall remove or cause to be removed by July 1, 1991, all right-of-way encroachments along the entire length of the highway or portion thereof which are not permitted by Transportation Commission and Transportation Department policies and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to state and federal law. Any such encroachments may be allowed to remain only by permits issued by the Mississippi Transportation Department in the manner and subject to the same conditions for the issuance of permits for similar encroachments on other highways on the state highway system. If traffic counts indicate that any highway or portions thereof placed under the jurisdiction of the Transportation Commission under the provisions of this section no longer form a substantial part of the state highway system, the Transportation Commission may request the Legislature to remove such highways or portions thereof from the state highway system and return said roads for maintenance to the county or municipality in which they are located, as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The highways which the Transportation Department is required to continue to maintain by virtue of the provisions of this section shall be in addition to the total mileage limitation of eight thousand six hundred (8,600) miles provided in Section 65-3-3.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall, no later than October 1, 1981, and October 1 each year thereafter, furnish the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives and the Highways and Transportation Committee of the Senate a recommendation for deletion of those highways or sections of highways which should be removed from the system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5001; 1942, § 8033; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 11; Laws, 1949, Ex Sess ch. 6, § 10; Laws, 1964, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, §§ 9, 33; Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 5; Laws, 1989, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 582, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-1-61.
Paving.

It shall be the duty of the Transportation Commission to have the Transportation Department construct, reconstruct and maintain, at the cost and expense of the state, all highways under its jurisdiction up to such standards and specifications and with such surfacing material as the Transportation Commission may determine, such paving to be done for each project as rapidly as funds are made available therefor and, as nearly as practicable, immediately upon the completion of all work performed pursuant to grade, drainage and bridge contracts for the project. Such paving shall be done in the order of the relative use and importance of said highways, as may be determined by the present and future traffic censuses thereof and other criteria, taking into consideration their present and future use, convenience, public necessity, public safety, the recorded maintenance expense, and their availability as highways through the state. The type of the paving and surfacing of such highways shall be determined by the executive director, subject to the rules, regulations and orders of the commission as spread on its minutes, after a complete study of the traffic requirements based upon the present and future traffic censuses, taking into consideration the factors above set forth. However, no highways shall be constructed, reconstructed, or maintained out of any patented paving material, regardless of what kind, on which a direct royalty is paid by the commission or any contractor; and the commission shall not have included in the plans or specifications for constructing, reconstructing, or maintenance of any highway the requirements that any material used or specified shall be laid under any process patented requiring the payment of a direct royalty for use of such process or patent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4999; 1942, § 8025; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1938, ch. 199; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 9; Laws, 1949, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, § 13; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 10; Laws, 1994, ch. 347, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 65-1-63.
Paving to connect county seat with paved road.

The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized and directed to have the state highway department construct, with its own funds, into each county seat in the state of Mississippi which now has no paved access road, a paved road which will connect said county seat with an existing paved road.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8025.5; Laws, 1956, ch. 326; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-65.
Maintenance.

It shall be the duty of the State Highway Commission to have the State Highway Department maintain all highways which have been or which may be hereafter taken over by the State Highway Department for maintenance in such a way as to afford convenient, comfortable, and economic use thereof by the public at all times. To this end it shall be the duty of the director, subject to the rules, regulations and orders of the commission as spread on its minutes, to organize an adequate and continuous patrol for the maintenance, repair, and inspection of all of the state-maintained state highway system, so that said highways may be kept under proper maintenance and repair at all times.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4999; 1942, § 8027; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1938, ch. 199; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 10 (first paragraph); Laws, 1949, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, § 14; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-67.
Edges of certain highways to be trimmed in color and manner conforming to uniform national standards.

The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to have the State Highway Department trim with edge lines, of a color and in a manner which conforms with uniform national standards relating thereto which have been adopted by the Federal Highway Administration, the edges of all state-designated hard-surfaced highways which are constructed of asphaltic material, in the interest of public safety on said highways. The commission is authorized and directed to have the highway department utilize its engineers and other highway department employees and to expend available public funds for carrying out the intent and purposes of this section.

Except as necessary to accommodate reconstruction, no road or highway shall be opened for public use until the department has complied with the provisions of this section; however, the Director of the State Highway Department may permit segments of roads under contract for maintenance, construction or reconstruction to be open for public use when temporary center line markings are installed. Roadside pennant signs may be used in place of temporary center line markings in no passing lanes on seal-coated roads. All such temporary center lines or roadside pennant signs shall, as nearly as practicable, be in place before work is discontinued for the day or as soon thereafter as weather conditions permit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8027.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 13; Laws, 1982, ch. 325; Laws, 1986, ch. 411; Laws, 1987, ch. 317, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 65-1-69.
Crossings.

Whenever any railroad and state highway or part thereof shall cross each other at the same level and, in the opinion of the State Highway Commission, such crossing is dangerous to public safety or traffic is unreasonably impeded thereby and such crossing should be removed, the State Highway Commission may order such crossing eliminated either by having the State Highway Department carry such state highway under or over the tracks of such railroad.

The plans covering such proposed changes may be made either by the director of the State Highway Department, subject to the approval of the highway commission or the railroad company affected, but shall in either event be approved by both the highway commission and the railroad company before contract is awarded; but such provision shall not be used to unreasonably delay the construction of any proposed structure. When plans have been approved, such proposed work shall be advertised and contract awarded as elsewhere provided in this chapter for the advertising and awarding of contracts. Joint supervision of construction may be had by both the State Highway Department and the railroad company. The state highway commission and the railroad company shall pay equal parts of the cost of any underpass or overpass across the right-of-way of the railroad company. Such work shall be so planned and prosecuted as to allow the safe and regular operations of trains at every stage of the work.

Appeals from decisions or determinations of the State Highway Commission may be made by any party affected under this section, and the procedure for such appeal shall be the same as is provided by law for appeals from decisions and determinations of the boards of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5007; 1942, § 8039; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 15; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-70.
Construction of protective devices at railroad crossings.

The Mississippi State Highway Department is authorized to construct protective devices or warning devices at or in the vicinity of any railroad crossing of a public highway under the jurisdiction of any county or incorporated municipality, based upon a showing of need resulting from a multidisciplinary study, whenever federal funds are available for such construction. The department is further authorized to supply, out of any available funds in the State Highway Fund, a maximum of one percent (1%) of the funds required for such construction if the county or incorporated municipality in which the construction will be performed complies with the necessary conditions for receipt of the balance of federal matching funds for such construction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 408, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 65-1-70.5.
Imputation of liability as to protective devices at railroad crossings.

The provisions of Section 65-1-70 shall not impute any liability of any kind or nature to the Mississippi State Highway Commission, the Mississippi State Highway Department or its agents, servants or employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 408, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 65-1-71.
Detours.

The director is hereby authorized to close highways for construction purposes and in emergencies, and shall select, lay out, maintain, and keep in as good repair as possible suitable detours by the most practicable route, where same are necessary for the public convenience while any sections of said highways or roads are being improved or constructed or closed. The director shall place or cause to be placed explicit directions to the traveling public during repair of said highway or road under process of construction. As far as practical roads already laid out shall be connected with and used for such detours.

The director is hereby authorized, subject to the approval of the commission, to enter into agreements, spread on the minutes of both boards, with the local road authorities of the county or counties in which construction or maintenance work is to be done, to pay all or any part of the cost of laying out or maintaining said detours. All expenses to the state of laying out and maintaining said detours shall be paid out of the state highway funds. The director is also authorized, subject to the approval of the commission, to make reasonable rules and regulations to keep highways under construction open to traffic where such action is deemed to be practical and desirable.

If any county-maintained road or municipally-maintained street is used temporarily as a part of a state highway detour, it shall be the duty of the highway department, when said detour is abandoned as such, to place the same in as good condition as said road or street was when its use as a detour began.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5002; 1942, § 8034; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 12.

§ 65-1-73.
Repair of city streets used as detours for United States highways.

The Mississippi State Highway Commission is authorized, in its discretion, to have the state highway department repair any paved city streets used as a detour subsequent to the year 1944 for any United States numbered highway while the same was under construction or reconstruction, provided such paved city streets were marked by the highway commission as such detour. The extent of the repairs authorized hereby shall be to place such streets in as good condition as the same were at the time their use as such detour began, and is supplemental to the authority provided by Section 65-1-71.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8034.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 401; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-75.
Municipalities.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is authorized and empowered to have the Transportation Department locate, construct, reconstruct and maintain any designated state highway under its jurisdiction to, through, across or around any municipality in the state, regardless of the width of the street between curbs; and in so locating it is fully empowered to follow the route of the existing street or to depart therefrom, as in its discretion it deems advisable, and to obtain and pay for the necessary rights-of-way, as provided in Section 65-1-47. The municipality in which such construction is to be undertaken is likewise authorized to acquire rights-of-way on any such streets or on any newly located routes, either by purchase, gift or condemnation. Such rights-of-way may be acquired by either the municipality or the Transportation Department, subject to the approval of the commission, and the cost thereof may be borne by either or both as may be mutually agreed upon. In any event such municipality may be required to save the commission and department harmless from any claims for damages arising from the construction of the highway through such municipality, including claims for rights-of-way, change of grade line, interference with public structures, and any and all damages so arising. Municipalities may secure additional improvements by payment of the additional cost of same. The commission may require such municipality to cause to be laid all water, sewer, gas or other pipelines or conduits, together with all necessary house or lot connections or services, to the curb line of such road or street to be constructed, and the commission is authorized to refuse to have the department lay such pipelines or conduits beneath such roads or streets until the municipality has laid same or entered into an agreement to reimburse the commission or department for the expense thereby incurred.

All construction of state highways in or through municipalities, where done at the cost and expense of the state, whether heretofore or hereafter, shall be maintained in the same manner and to the same extent as is construction on state highways outside the limits of municipalities to the end that investment of the state in such highway so constructed may be preserved and maintained; and all reasonable rules and regulations with reference to the preservation and maintenance of such highways constructed at state expense, whether within or without municipal limits, may be promulgated by the commission, except that it shall have no power to promulgate police regulations contrary to existing law. On any municipal streets or parts or sections thereof taken over for regular maintenance and maintained by the department as a part of the state highway system, the municipality shall not be liable for negligence occasioned by the maintenance or repair of such streets thus apportioned to and of such width as is maintained by the department. The municipality shall have full control and responsibility beyond the curb lines of any designated highway or street, whether heretofore or hereafter so designated, (except the interstate system) located within its present or future expanded municipal corporate limits, regardless of the ownership of the right-of-way, including but not limited to, the construction and maintenance of sidewalks, grass mowing and drainage systems; however, the department may utilize the right-of-way purchased by the commission without any additional cost or permission.

The municipality shall not allow any encroachments, signs or billboards to be erected or to remain on state-owned rights-of-way on any designated highway within its corporate limits without the consent of the commission. The municipality, at its own expense, shall provide street illumination and shall clean all streets, including storm sewer inlets and catch basins. The commission may enter into an agreement with the municipality or with a private entity to sweep and clean the designated highways within or without the corporate limits. The commission may, at state expense, provide illumination and may clean all interstate highways within the corporate limits of any municipality. The right of the municipality to grant franchises over, beneath and upon such streets is specifically retained, but the municipality shall require every grantee of a franchise to restore, repair and replace to its original condition any portion of any such street damaged or injured by it; however, permission to open the surface of any municipal street maintained by the department must be obtained from both the commission and the municipality concerned before any such opening is made. Each municipality shall retain full police power over its streets, particularly as to regulating and enforcing traffic and parking restrictions on such streets, but any traffic control and parking regulations repugnant to state law shall be null and void. The commission shall have the department erect, control and maintain all highway route markers and directional signs on such streets at state expense. The commission, at state expense, shall have the department install, operate, maintain, control, and have full jurisdiction over, all traffic control devices, including, but not limited to, signals, signs, striping and lane markings on state highway streets in municipalities having a population of twenty thousand (20,000) or less according to the current U.S. census; but municipalities over twenty thousand (20,000) population according to such census shall install, operate, maintain and control such devices at their own expense, subject to approval of the executive director regarding operations, method of installation and type only. Municipalities having a population of five thousand (5,000) or more but less than twenty thousand (20,000) according to the most recent federal census shall only be responsible for electrical operating costs; and all other costs for the installation, operation and maintenance of traffic control devices, including the changing of signal bulbs in traffic signal lights, shall be the responsibility of the Transportation Department. The commission may purchase at state expense and install traffic control devices in municipalities over twenty thousand (20,000) population and donate them to the municipalities for operation and maintenance whenever it appears to the commission that, in the interest of safety or convenience of the motoring public, any of the devices should be upgraded, replaced or removed. Any revenue from parking meters on any such streets shall be controlled by and belong to the municipality.

The maintenance of all streets within the limits of any municipality in this state, regardless of size, which are presently being regularly maintained, in whole or in part, by the department at state expense as a part or parts of any designated state highway shall be continued. Whenever any state highway runs into or through the corporate limits of any municipality, the municipal street or the street utilized and marked as a part of any such state highway may be a part of the state highway system and may be maintained by the department; however, such route through any municipality shall be selected by the commission by orders spread on its minutes describing all such routes, and such route or routes may be changed, relocated or abandoned by the commission from time to time, all under the provisions, terms and conditions herein provided, but the commission shall have the department maintain only one (1) route of any highway through a municipality. Upon relocation of such state highway or abandonment thereof, the municipal street formerly used as a state highway shall thereby return to the jurisdiction of, and maintenance by, the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5005; 1942, § 8037; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 13; Laws, 1949, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 16; Laws, 1995, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 607, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1997).

§ 65-1-77.
Agreements for highway and street projects forming part of overall plan encompassed by Title 23, United States Code.

The State Highway Commission and the counties and municipalities of the state are hereby authorized to enter into agreements for highway and street projects which are a part of an overall plan to be administered under the provisions of Title 23, United States Code. Such agreements may provide for traffic engineering assistance to the local governments for the development by the State Highway Department of records systems for local roads and streets. The counties and municipalities of the state are authorized to deposit with the State Highway Department the federal aid matching requirement for the project from any available fund. The county and/or municipal share and the federal share will be handled in the manner provided therefor in Section 65-9-17. The county will be required to fulfill its obligation for maintenance of any project constructed under this authorization in the same manner required of or for any state aid road. It shall be the duty of the municipal officials of any incorporated city entering into this agreement to properly maintain and operate any completed project or improvement on the municipal street system. It shall be the duty of the chief engineer of the State Highway Department and his assistants to make at least annual maintenance inspections of completed projects and such other periodic inspections as he shall deem necessary. If essential maintenance is not properly and regularly done in the opinion of the chief engineer, then notice shall be given by the director of the State Highway Department in writing to the county or municipality in fault; and, if such maintenance is not done and continued within sixty (60) days from the date of such notice, then the director of the State Highway Department may proceed to have done the necessary maintenance and repair work on such street and have the cost of same credited to the State Highway Fund from any fund available to the county or municipality within the state treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8059.5-51; Laws, 1970, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-79.
Agreements for purpose of securing federal aid funds available under Title 23, United States Code.

The State Highway Commission is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States of America for the purpose of securing federal aid funds when available under the provisions of Title 23, United States Code. The federal aid received under this authorization may be used on roads and streets, either on or off the designated highway system or designated state aid system. The State Highway Commission is given the power and authority to approve the system of roads and streets when the approval of such system(s) establishes the eligibility for these roads and streets for federally funded projects when the necessary matching requirement of the federal aid is supplied by the political subdivision wherein the system or project lies. The State Highway Commission is further vested with full authority to determine the priority of the expenditure of these funds and to approve the priority of improvements financed as a result of such authorization.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8059.5-52; Laws, 1970, ch. 441, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 318, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 5, 1974).